src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2
! or any later version.

LEXICON Pronouns
Interrogatives ;
Personal ;
Reflexive ;

LEXICON Personal
eu+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom:eu # ;
tu+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom:tu # ;
el+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom:el # ;
ea+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom:ea # ;
noi+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom:noi # ;
voi+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom:voi # ;
ei+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom:ei # ;
ele+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom:ele # ;

eu+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc:mine # ;
tu+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc:tine # ;
el+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:el # ;
ea+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:ea # ;
noi+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc:noi # ;
voi+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc:voi # ;
ei+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc:ei # ;
ele+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc:ele # ;

eu+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc:mă # ;
tu+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc:te # ;
el+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:îl # ;
ea+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:o # ;
noi+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc:ne # ;
voi+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc:vă # ;
ei+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc:îl # ;
ele+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc:le # ;

eu+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat:mie # ;
tu+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat:ție # ;
el+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat:lui # ;
ea+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat:ei # ;
noi+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Dat:nouă # ;
voi+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dat:vouă # ;
ei+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Dat:lor # ;
ele+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Dat:lor # ;

eu+Pron+Pers+Dat:îmi # ;
tu+Pron+Pers+Dat:îți # ;
el+Pron+Pers+Dat:îi # ;
ea+Pron+Pers+Dat:îi # ;
noi+Pron+Pers+Dat:ne # ;
voi+Pron+Pers+Dat:vă # ;
ei+Pron+Pers+Dat:le # ;
ele+Pron+Pers+Dat:le # ;

LEXICON Interrogatives
cine interr ; !who?
cum interr ; !how?
ce interr ; !what? (not polite)
poftim interr ; !what? (polite)
unde interr ; !where?
când interr ; !when?

LEXICON Reflexive
mă+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Nom:mă # ;
te+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Nom:te # ;
se+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Nom:se # ;
ne+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Nom:ne # ;
vă+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Nom:vă # ;
se+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Nom:se # ;

mă+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Dat:îmi # ;
te+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Dat:îți # ;
se+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Dat:îşi # ;
ne+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Dat:ne # ;
vă+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Dat:vă # ;
se+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Dat:îşi # ;


LEXICON interr
+Pron+Interr: # ;
